Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-189
Discontinuance of district; sale of property; action to collect purchase price; in whose name brought.

All suits at law or equity brought for the purpose of collecting such evidences of indebtedness, shall be brought in the name of such district by counsel employed by the district board; and in case the board shall be disorganized, such employment shall be by the board of such county.

Laws 1903, c. 123, § 1, p. 628;

R.S.1913, § 3521;

C.S.1922, § 2921;

C.S.1929, § 46-166;

R.S.1943, § 46-189.